Florida, session 2026, HB59.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
42
43 Section 1. This act may be cited as "Ava's Law."
44 Section 2. Section 907.033, Florida Statutes, is created
45 to read:
46 907.033 Pregnancy testing of female arrestees.—Every
47 female who is arrested and not released on bond within 72 hours
48 after arrest must, upon her request, be administered a pregnancy
49 test by the municipal detention facility or county detention
50 facility, as those terms are defined in s. 951.23(1), where she
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb59-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 59 2026
51 is being held within 24 hours after the request. During booking
52 into the facility, the facility must notify each such arrestee
53 of her right to request that a pregnancy test be administered
54 within 72 hours after arrest if she is still in custody. The
55 pregnancy test may be conducted by using urine or blood samples,
56 by ultrasound scan, or by any other standard pregnancy testing
57 protocols adopted by the facility. As used in this section, the
58 term "female" means a juvenile or an adult woman.
59 Section 3. Section 925.13, Florida Statutes, is created to
60 read:
61 925.13 Staying of sentence for pregnant women.—
62 (1) As used in this section, the term "pregnant woman"
63 means a juvenile or an adult woman whose pregnancy has been
64 verified by a pregnancy test or through a medical examination
65 conducted by a health care practitioner.
66 (2) Notwithstanding any other law, after a pregnant woman
67 is convicted of any offense and the sentencing court pronounces
68 a sentence of incarceration, the court has the discretion to
69 stay the beginning of the period of incarceration for up to 12
70 weeks after the pregnant woman gives birth or is no longer
71 pregnant. In determining whether to grant a pregnant woman's
72 request to stay the beginning of the period of incarceration,
73 the court must consider all of the following:
74 (a) The severity of the offense for which the defendant is
75 convicted.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb59-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 59 2026
76 (b) Whether the defendant was previously convicted of a
77 felony.
78 (c) Whether other felony charges are pending against the
79 defendant.
80 (d) The state's interest in deterring and punishing
81 criminal activity and protecting the public.
82 (e) The rights of the victim of the defendant's crime,
83 consistent with s. 16, Art. I of the State Constitution and s.
84 960.0021.
85 (f) Whether staying the incarceration is consistent with
86 protecting the life, health, and safety of the unborn child and
87 his or her life during the first 12 weeks after birth. In
88 considering this factor, the court shall consider the existence
89 of any prior substance abuse by the defendant, whether any other
90 children of the defendant have been adjudicated dependent, and
91 any other information relevant to the health and safety of the
92 unborn child.
93
94 If the court grants the request to stay the incarceration, it
95 must explain its reasons in writing.
96 (3) The sentencing court may order a pregnant woman whose
97 incarceration is stayed to comply with any of the terms and
98 conditions specified in s. 948.03 until she is incarcerated.
99 (4) Within 10 days after the end of the stay of
100 incarceration and the commencement of the woman's incarceration
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb59-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 59 2026
101 to serve the sentence, she must be offered an appropriate
102 assessment by a licensed health care practitioner or a
103 telehealth provider, as defined in s. 456.47(1), and, upon her
104 request, the licensed health care practitioner or telehealth
105 provider shall provide a postpartum assessment, including the
106 need for any necessary medical tests, procedures, lactation
107 support, mental health support, or treatments associated with
108 her postpartum condition. The Department of Corrections and
109 municipal and county detention facilities shall develop and
110 offer such assessments and treatments in consultation with
111 community support organizations, licensed health care
112 practitioners, social services programs, and local and state
113 government agencies, including nonprofit organizations.
114 (5) If, during the stay of incarceration, the pregnant
115 woman is convicted of another crime or violates any of the
116 conditions imposed by the sentencing judge, the judge may impose
117 any sanction under s. 948.06, including an order requiring the
118 incarceration of the pregnant woman to serve the sentence for
119 which the stay was granted.
120 (6)(a) The Department of Corrections shall collect from
121 its own institutions, and each municipal and county detention
122 facility shall collect and report to the department, all of the
123 following information, which the department shall compile and
124 publish quarterly on its public website:
125 1. The total number of pregnant women whose sentences are
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb59-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 59 2026
126 stayed under subsection (2).
127 2. The total number of births, including the number of
128 live births and stillbirths, to women whose sentences are
129 stayed, and the gestational age and birth weight of each infant
130 at the time of birth or stillbirth.
131 3. The total number of women who experience complications
132 during pregnancy and the type of complications experienced.
133 4. The total number of women who experience miscarriages.
134 5. The total number of women who refuse to provide
135 information regarding the outcome of their pregnancies as
136 provided in subparagraphs 2., 3., and 4.
137 (b) The information published pursuant to paragraph (a)
138 must exclude personal identifying information and must comply
139 with state and federal confidentiality laws.
140 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb59-00